California statutes. Education Code
(a) The actual cost of establishing the vendor registration system and the investment information bank shall be borne equally by registered vendors, based on the total number of registered vendors. Each registered vendor shall pay a one-time establishment fee equal to a pro rata share of the establishment costs charged to vendors that register with the board prior to the close of the initial registration period, as determined by the board. The one-time establishment fee charged to vendors that register with the board after the completion of the initial registration period shall be distributed equally among registered vendors that have paid the establishment fee, and credited toward subsequent maintenance and administrative fees charged to each vendor.

(b) The actual cost of maintaining the vendor registration system and the investment information bank, and the costs associated with publicizing the availability of the investment information bank to local school districts, community college districts, and county offices of education and their employees, shall be borne equally by registered vendors, based on the total number of registered vendors. Each registered vendor shall pay a renewal fee equal to a pro rata share of the maintenance costs, as determined by the board.

(c) Each registered vendor shall pay an administrative fee for each 403(b) product it offers to school employees, which shall represent the actual costs associated with processing the information related to the investment option and presenting it on the investment information bank, as determined by the board.

(d) The board may not divert member services resources or personnel to establish or maintain the registration list.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1095, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25109.

(a) The board and the system, and its officers and employees, are not responsible for, and may not be held liable for the adequacy of the information provided by the participating vendors contained in the information bank. The information bank maintained by the board serves only to provide information supplied by the participating vendors for the consideration of selection of 403(b) products.

(b) Participating vendors may not utilize the system’s logo, or claim or infer any endorsement or recommendation by the board or the system with respect to products and services identified by the vendors in the information bank. At the discretion of the board, a violation of this section may lead to removal from the registry. This restriction does not apply to 403(b) products offered by the board to school employees pursuant to Section 24950.

(c) The board and the system may not be held liable for the actions of other registered vendors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1095, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25110.

The board shall complete the initial registration process on or before July 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1095, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25111.

Each employer, in consultation with the exclusive bargaining agent of its employees, if any, may develop a process to ensure that employees are aware of, and have access to, information provided in the impartial investment bank maintained by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 230, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25112.

Personnel, including elected school officials, acting on behalf of an employer, may not receive consideration from a vendor in exchange for the promotion of a particular vendor or vendor’s products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 230, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25113.

An employer may not forward annuity or custodial account consideration to the vendor of any unregistered 403(b) product, except insofar as an employee continues making contributions to an unregistered product or products as described in Section 25114.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 230, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25114.

Except as provided in this section, an employee shall select from registered 403(b) products.

(a) An employee of a local school district, community college district, or county office of education may continue to make contributions to unregistered products purchased or entered into prior to November 30, 2004.

(b) A state employee of a state employer under the uniform state payroll system, excluding the California State University System, eligible to participate in an annuity contract and custodial account as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, may continue to make contributions to unregistered products purchased
 or entered into prior to January 1, 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 864, Sec. 18.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25115.

For purposes of restricting the use of 403(b) investment products provided to eligible employees of employers by those vendors and investment products registered with the board pursuant to this chapter, the provisions of Section 770.3 of the Insurance Code do not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 230, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 13.5. HEALTH CARE BENEFITS PROGRAM [25900. - 25955.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [25900. - 25900.]

25900.

(a) All costs incurred by the system to develop health care benefit programs pursuant to this part shall be paid by allocations from the Teachers’ Retirement Fund as appropriated for that purpose.

(b) Any health care benefits program developed by the system pursuant to this part shall not be implemented by the system unless specifically authorized by a statute enacted by the Legislature.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25000 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1032, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [25901. - 25926.]

25901.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25100 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25910.

“Beneficiary” or “beneficiaries” means any person or entity receiving or entitled to receive an allowance and payment pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000) or 14 (commencing with Section 26000) because of the disability or death of a member.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25110 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25915.

(a) “Dependent child” or “dependent children” means a member’s unmarried offspring or stepchild who is not older than 22 years of age and who is financially dependent upon the member on the date the member becomes eligible for benefits pursuant to this part.

(b) “Offspring” shall include the member’s child who is born within the 10-month period commencing on the date the member becomes eligible for benefits pursuant to this part.

(c) “Offspring” shall include a child adopted by the member.

(d) “Dependent child” shall not include the member’s offspring or stepchild who is adopted by a person other than the member’s spouse.

(e) “Financially dependent,” for purposes of this section, means that at least one-half of the child’s support was being provided by the member on the date the member became eligible for benefits pursuant to this part. The system may require that income tax records or other data be submitted to substantiate the child’s financial dependence. In the absence of substantiating documentation, the system may determine that the child was not dependent on the date the member became eligible for benefits pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25115 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25920.

“Dependent parent” or “dependent parents” means a natural parent or parents of a member, or a parent or parents who adopted the member prior to the earlier of the occurrence of the member’s marriage or his or her attaining 18 years of age, and who was receiving one-half or more of his or her support from the member at the time the member became eligible for benefits pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25120 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25921.

“Employer” means the state or any agency or political subdivision thereof for which creditable service subject to coverage by the plan, as defined in Section 22155.5, is performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 803, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25923.

“Fund” means the Teachers’ Health Benefits Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1032, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25925.

“Member” means a current or retired employee of an employer, as defined in Section 25921.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 803, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25926.

“School year” means the period of time beginning on July 1 of one calendar year and ending on June 30 of the following calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 25.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Establishment and Control of Fund [25930. - 25933.]

25930.

There is in the State Treasury a special trust fund to be known as the Teachers’ Health Benefits Fund. There shall be deposited in the fund the employer contributions required under subdivision (c) of Section 22950, income on investments, other interest income, income from fees and penalties, premiums paid by members, donations, legacies, bequests made to the fund and accepted by the board, and any other amounts provided by this part. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the proceeds of the fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year for purposes of this part. The design and administration of the fund and any program financed from the fund shall comply with Section 115 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 803, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25931.

The board shall have exclusive control of the administration of the fund. No transfers or disbursements of any amount from the fund shall be made except upon the authorization of the board for the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this part. Except as otherwise limited by the California Constitution and by law, the board may, in its discretion, invest the assets of the fund through the purchase, holding, or sale of any investment, financial instrument, or financial transaction, when the investment, financial instrument, or financial transaction is prudent in the informed opinion of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1032, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25932.

Return on investments shall be collected by the State Treasurer and, together with any other moneys received for the fund, shall be immediately deposited to the credit of the fund and reported immediately to the system. Money in whatever form received directly by the system for the fund shall be deposited immediately in the State Treasury to the credit of the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1032, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25933.

(a) For purposes of this section, “plan” means any health benefits program that is financed from the proceeds of the fund.

(b) The board shall maintain all data necessary to perform an actuarial investigation of the demographic and economic experience of the plan and for the actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the plan.

(c) The board shall retain the services of an actuary to do all of the following:

(1) Make recommendations to the board for the adoption of actuarial assumptions that, in the aggregate, are reasonably related to the past experience of the plan and reflect the actuary’s informed estimate of future experience.

(2) Make an actuarial investigation of the demographic and economic experience, including the mortality, service, and other experience, of the plan with respect to members or any other persons eligible to receive benefits from the plan.

(3) At least biennially, using actuarial assumptions adopted by the board, perform an actuarial valuation of the plan that identifies the assets and liabilities of the plan, and report the findings to the board. The report of the actuary on the results of the actuarial valuation shall identify and include the components of normal cost and adequate information to determine the effects of changes in actuarial assumptions. Copies of the report on the actuarial valuation shall be transmitted to the Governor and to the Legislature.

(4) Recommend to the board all rates and factors necessary to administer the plan, including, but not limited to, mortality tables and interest rates.

(5) Recommend to the board a strategy for amortizing any unfunded actuarial obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Medicare Premium Payment Program [25940. - 25955.]

25940.

(a) Effective July 1, 2001, the system shall pay to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or a successor agency the premiums associated with Medicare Part A for retired or disabled members described in this section.

(b) This section shall apply only to a retired member of the Defined Benefit Program who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The member retired prior to January 1, 2001, or began receiving a disability allowance prior to January 1, 2001, and has been continually disabled since January 1, 2001.

(2) The member is not
 eligible for Medicare Part A without payment of a premium.

(3) The member is at least 65 years of age.

(4) The member enrolled in Medicare Parts A and B.

(c) The board may extend eligibility for the payments described in this section to members of the Defined Benefit Program who meet the requirements of subdivision (d) and who retire or begin receiving a disability allowance on or after January 1, 2001, within a school year specified by the board, if the board finds that the cost of the payments for members who retire or begin receiving a disability allowance during the specified school year may be paid within the anticipated resources available in the fund, as determined by the actuarial valuation of the program established by this chapter. Any extension of eligibility to members who retire or begin receiving a
 disability allowance on or after January 1, 2001, shall be provided equally to any member who meets the requirements of subdivision (d) and retires or begins receiving a disability allowance during the school year specified by the board.

(d) (1) Eligibility for the payments described in this section pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be limited to members of the Defined Benefit Program who do either of the following:

(A) Retires from an employer that does either of the following:

(i) Completed a division pursuant to Section 22156 of the Government Code prior to January 1, 2001.

(ii) Completed or is conducting a division pursuant to Section 22156 of the Government Code on or after January 1, 2001, and, if the member was less than 58
 years of age at the time of the division, the member elected to be covered by Medicare.

(B) Began receiving a disability allowance and continuously receives a disability allowance until 65 years of age or older and the member’s last employer does any of the following:

(i) Completed a division pursuant to Section 22156 of the Government Code prior to January 1, 2001.

(ii) Completed or is conducting a division pursuant to Section 22156 of the Government Code on or after January 1, 2001, and, if the member was still actively employed and less than 58 years of age at the time of the division, the member elected to be covered by Medicare.

(iii) Completed or is conducting a division pursuant to Section 22156 of the Government Code on or after January 1, 2001,
 and, if the member is no longer actively employed, the division was completed prior to the time the member reached normal retirement age.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), a division occurs during the 10-day period during which the member has the opportunity to elect to be covered by Medicare pursuant to Section 22156 of the Government Code.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a member who retires from a district, or is receiving a disability allowance and the member was last employed in a district, that either as of January 1, 2001, had no members who were less than 58 years of age and who were hired prior to April 1, 1986, or was created pursuant to a formation or a reorganization on or after April 1, 1986, and prior to January 1, 2001.

(e) The amount paid to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
 Services or a successor agency pursuant to this section shall include any surcharges applicable to enrollment in Medicare Part A or Part B by members who retired prior to January 1, 2001, and who enrolled in Medicare Parts A and B after the age of 65 years and prior to July 1, 2001. If the system pays the Part A premium and Part B surcharges on behalf of a member and that member later becomes eligible for Part A coverage without payment of a premium, the system shall continue to pay any applicable Part B surcharges on behalf of that member. The board may require a member on whose behalf a surcharge would be paid pursuant to this subdivision to authorize the system to deduct the Part B premium from the member’s retirement allowance as a condition of having the system pay the Part A premium pursuant to this section.

(f) For the purposes of this section, if a retirement date is used to determine eligibility pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c),
 the system shall use the member’s most recent retirement date for eligibility purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 54.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25950.

On or before April 1, 2001, the board shall report to the Legislature on a prescription drug program and a program to provide health benefits to retired members. The report shall include an analysis of all potential methods of financing and administering the programs. These shall include, but are not limited to, (1) the system providing those health benefits under contracts with carriers or other entities that administer health benefits plans, (2) reimbursing employers for the costs of providing those health benefits to retired employees, and (3) crediting employers and employing agencies, against the amount contributed pursuant to Section 22950, a monthly amount, adjusted annually, for each retiree the employer or employing agency certifies is enrolled in one or more health care benefits programs administered or sponsored by the employer or employing agency. The report shall include an estimate of the fiscal impact of each program on the system, including administration and program costs, and recommended statutory language to implement each program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25955.

To recover an amount overpaid under this part, the monthly allowance payable under the Defined Benefit Program may be reduced by the amount of the overpayment. If the overpayment is not due to fraud or intentional misrepresentation of facts by the recipient of the allowance or benefit, the monthly allowance may be reduced by no more than 5 percent if the overpayment was due to error by the system, the county superintendent of schools, a school district, or a community college district, and by no more than 15 percent if the error was due to inaccurate or omitted information from the recipient of the allowance or benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 375, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 14. STATE TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM CASH BENEFIT PROGRAM [26000. - 28101.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [26000. - 26004.]

26000.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the State Teachers’ Retirement System Cash Balance Plan was created and established on July 1, 1996, to provide a retirement plan for persons employed by an employer offering the Cash Balance Plan, excluding a community college district, to perform creditable service for less than 50 percent of the full-time equivalent for the position, or employed by a community college district offering the Cash Balance Plan to perform creditable service on a temporary basis pursuant to Section 87474, 87478, 87480, 87481, 87482, or 87482.5, or employed by an employer offering the Cash Balance Plan to perform creditable service as a substitute employee. The persons eligible for the Cash Balance Plan were excluded from mandatory membership in the State Teachers’ Retirement System
 Defined Benefit Plan. Both plans are administered by the Teachers’ Retirement Board. Because both plans were intended to provide for the retirement of teachers and other persons employed in connection with the public schools of this state and schools supported by this state, a merger of these two plans is now hereby made for the purpose of establishing a single retirement plan that shall be known and may be cited as the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan consisting of the different benefit programs set forth in this part and Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000). The plan shall be administered by the Teachers’ Retirement Board as set forth in this part and Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000). As a result of this merger, a Cash Balance Benefit Program will be provided under the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan and that program is set forth in this part.

The governing board of a school district, community college district, or county office of education may, by
 formal action, elect to provide the benefits of the Cash Balance Benefit Program under this part for their employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 27.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26000.5.

An employer whose governing board has elected to provide the benefits of this part for its employees pursuant to Section 26000 shall enter into an agreement with the State Teachers’ Retirement System. The agreement shall specify the terms and conditions of the employer’s formal action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program and shall remain in effect unless or until the employer exercises the right to discontinue the program pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 28100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

26000.6.

(a) An election by any employer to provide the benefits of the Cash Balance Plan for their employees prior to the merger described in Section 26000 shall be deemed to constitute an election to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program under the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan.

(b) Participation in the Cash Balance Plan by any participant prior to the merger described in Section 26000 shall be deemed to constitute participation in the Cash Balance Benefit Program under the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan.

(c) Any beneficiary under the Cash Balance Plan prior to the merger described in Section 26000 shall be deemed to be a beneficiary under the Cash Balance Benefit Program under the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26001.

The design and administration of the plan, including the Cash Balance Benefit Program, shall comply with the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and the Revenue and Taxation Code. The Teachers’ Retirement Board may amend the plan to comply with the applicable federal laws and regulations to the extent permitted by law, to establish or revise the minimum interest rate, to declare additional earnings credit, to declare additional annuity credit, and to adopt and amend actuarial assumptions for all purposes under the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 229.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26002.

The Cash Balance Benefit Program shall be administered by the Teachers’ Retirement Board with all of the powers, responsibilities and duties for administration of the plan set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 22200) through Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 22375) of Part 13. In administering the plan, the board and its officers and employees of the system shall exercise their fiduciary duties set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22250) of Part 13.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 230.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26002.5.

Except as excluded in subdivision (d) of Section 26807.5 or subdivision (c) of Section 26906.5, a person who is the registered domestic partner of a member, as established pursuant to Section 297 or 299.2 of the Family Code, shall be treated in the same manner as a “spouse,” as defined in Section 26140.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 28.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26003.

If any provision of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this part that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26004.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) The benefits payable to any participant or beneficiary under this part shall be subject to the limitations imposed by Section 415 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(b) The amount of compensation that is taken into account in computing benefits under this part for a plan year shall not exceed the annual compensation limit applicable to that plan year in accordance with Section 401(a)(17) of Title 26 of the United States Code as that section read on the effective date of this section and as that section may be amended after that date. The determination of compensation for a 12-month period shall be subject to the annual compensation limit in effect for the calendar year in
 which the 12-month period begins. In a determination of average compensation over more than one 12-month period, the amount of compensation taken into account for each 12-month period shall be subject to the respective annual compensation limit applicable to that period.

(c) Distributions from the plan under this part shall be made in accordance with Section 401(a)(9) of Title 26 of the United States Code, including the incidental death benefit requirements of Section 401(a)(9)(G) and the regulations thereunder. The required beginning date of benefit payments that represent the entire interest of the participant shall be as follows:

(1) In the case of a lump-sum distribution of a retirement benefit, disability benefit, or termination benefit, the lump-sum payment shall be made not later than April 1 of the calendar year following the later of (A) the calendar year in which the
 participant attains the age at which the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 requires a distribution of benefits or (B) the calendar year in which the participant terminates all employment subject to coverage by the plan.

(2) In the case of a retirement benefit or disability benefit that is to be paid in the form of an annuity, payment of the annuity shall begin not later than April 1 of the calendar year following the later of (A) the calendar year in which the participant attains the age at which the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 requires a distribution of benefits or (B) the calendar year in which the participant terminates employment in all positions subject to coverage by the plan, with the annuity to continue over the life of the participant or the life of the participant and the participant’s option beneficiary, or over a period not to exceed the life expectancy of the participant or the life expectancy of the participant and the participant’s
 option beneficiary.

(3) In the case of a death benefit, distributions shall commence as follows:

(A) The normal form of the benefit or other lump-sum distribution shall be paid in accordance with Section 401(a)(9) of Title 26 of the United States Code and the regulations thereunder.

(B) Annuity payments shall commence as follows:

(i) If the spouse is the sole beneficiary, not later than December 31 of the later of the calendar year in which the participant would have attained the age at which the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 requires a distribution of benefits or the calendar year following the calendar year of the participant’s death.

(ii) If the spouse is not the sole beneficiary, not
 later than December 31 of the calendar year following the calendar year of the participant’s death.

(d) If a person becomes entitled to a distribution from the plan under this part that constitutes an eligible rollover distribution within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the person may elect under terms and conditions established by the board to have the distribution or a portion thereof paid directly to a plan that constitutes an eligible retirement plan within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31), as specified by that person. Upon the exercise of the election by a person with respect to a distribution or a portion thereof, the distribution from the plan of the amount so designated, once distributable under the terms of the plan, shall be made in the form of a direct rollover to the eligible retirement plan so specified.

(e) The amount of any
 benefit from the plan under this part that is determined on the basis of actuarial assumptions shall be based on actuarial assumptions adopted by the board pursuant to Section 26213 as a plan amendment with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program and those assumptions shall preclude employer discretion and comply with Section 401(a)(25) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 117, Sec. 6.   (AB 2770)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [26100. - 26145.]

26100.

Unless otherwise specified, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26101.

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit that has the same present value as the benefit it replaces based on interest rates and mortality tables recommended by the actuary and adopted by the board as a plan amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26102.

“Actuary” means a person professionally trained in the technical and mathematical aspects of insurance, pensions, and related fields who has been appointed by the board for the purpose of actuarial services required under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 231.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26103.

“Additional earnings credit” means a percentage determined by the board for a plan year by means of a plan amendment and credited to employee accounts and employer accounts on a specified date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26104.

“Administrative costs” means the costs of administering the Cash Balance Benefit Program for the plan year as determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

26105.

“Annuitant Reserve” means the reserve account established by the board within the State Teachers’ Retirement Fund for the payment of monthly annuities with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26106.

“Annuity” means an amount of money payable in monthly installments for a period determined by the option elected by the participant or beneficiary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26106.5.

(a) For purposes of this part, “annuity beneficiary” means the person or trust designated by a participant pursuant to Section 26807, 26807.5, 26906, or 26906.5 to receive an annuity upon the participant’s death. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “trust” means an irrevocable trust with the following characteristics:

(1) The trust satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 1396p of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) The trust satisfies the requirements of Section 1.401(a)(9)-4 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(3) The trust, or the account in a pooled trust, is for the sole benefit of a single beneficiary and other beneficiaries to the trust, if any, are successor beneficiaries.

(4) The beneficiary of the trust who is beneficiary with respect to the trust’s interest in the participant’s benefit shall be considered the designated beneficiary for the purpose of determining eligibility for, and the amount and duration of, benefits under the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 13.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26107.

“Basis of employment” means the standard of time over which the employer expects service to be performed by an employee in the position during the school term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 26.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

26108.

“Beneficiary” means any person or persons or entity designated by the participant pursuant to this part or otherwise entitled by law to receive the death benefit under the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26109.

“Board” means the Teachers’ Retirement Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26112.

“Cash Balance Benefit Program” means the benefit program set forth in this part of the State Teachers’ Retirement Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26112.5.

(a) “Class of employees” means a number of employees considered as a group because they are employed to perform similar duties, are employed in the same type of program, or share other similarities related to the nature of the work being performed.

(b) A class of employees may be comprised of one person if no other person employed by the employer performs similar duties, is employed in the same type of program, or shares other similarities related to the nature of the work being performed and that same class is in common use among other employers.

(c) The board shall have the right to override the determination by an employer as to whether or not a group or an individual constitutes a “class of employees” within the meaning of this section.

(d) This section shall be deemed to have become operative on July 1, 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1165, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

26113.

(a) “Creditable service” means any of the activities described in subdivision (b) performed for any of the following employers:

(1) A prekindergarten through grade 12 employer in a position with certification qualifications authorized by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to Section 44001.

(2) A community college employer by a faculty member, as defined in Section 87003, in an academic position, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 87001, or by an educational administrator, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 87002, subject to the appropriate minimum standards adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges pursuant to Section 87356, or pursuant to a
 contract between a community college district and the United States Department of Defense to provide vocational training.

(3) A charter school employer under the provisions of an approved charter for the operation of a charter school for which the charter school is eligible to receive state apportionment.

(b) The types of activities are any of the following:

(1) The work of teachers, instructors, district interns, and academic employees employed in the instructional program for pupils, including special programs such as adult education, regional occupational programs, childcare centers, and prekindergarten programs pursuant to Section 22161.

(2) Education or vocational counseling, guidance, and placement services.

(3) The work of employees who plan courses of study to be used in California public schools, or research connected with the evaluation or efficiency of the instructional program.

(4) The selection, collection, preparation, classification, demonstration, or evaluation of instructional materials of any course of study for use in the development of the instructional program in California public schools, or other services related to California public school curriculum.

(5) The examination, selection, in-service training, mentoring, or assignment of teachers, principals, or other similar personnel involved in the instructional program.

(6) The work of nurses, physicians, speech therapists, psychologists, audiologists, and other California public school health
 professionals.

(7) Services as a California public school librarian.

(8) Activities connected with the enforcement of the laws relating to compulsory education, coordination of child welfare activities involving the school and the home, and the school adjustment of pupils.

(9) The work of employees who are responsible for the supervision of persons or administration of the duties described in this subdivision.

(c) “Creditable service” also means any of the activities described in subdivision (b) when they are performed for an employer by:

(1) Superintendents of California public schools, and presidents and chancellors of community college employers.

(2) Consulting teachers employed by an employer to participate in the California Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44500) of Chapter 3 of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2.
